Florida, session 2026, HB1191.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
85
86 Section 1. Section 101.7311, Florida Statutes, is created
87 to read:
88 101.7311 Application of Elections Emergency Act.—In the
89 event of an emergency, elections must be conducted in accordance
90 with the Elections Emergency Act which governs the suspension,
91 delay, rescheduling, contingency planning, and deployment of
92 election equipment necessary to ensure a safe and orderly
93 election. These provisions must be carried out in a manner that
94 upholds the integrity of elections administration, fosters trust
95 in elections, and secures the maximum possible participation of
96 eligible voters.
97 Section 2. Subsection (3) of section 101.732, Florida
98 Statutes, is amended to read:
99 101.732 Definitions relating to Elections Emergency Act.—
100 As used in ss. 101.731-101.74:
Page 4 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1191-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1191 2026
101 (3) "Emergency" means any occurrence, or threat thereof,
102 whether accidental, natural, or caused by human beings, in war
103 or in peace, that results or may result in substantial injury or
104 harm to the population or substantial damage to or loss of
105 property to the extent it will prohibit an election officer's
106 ability to conduct a safe and orderly election or impair the
107 ability of voters to safely and accessibly cast their ballot in
108 accordance with state and federal requirements ensuring equal
109 opportunity for all eligible voters.
110 Section 3. Section 101.7325, Florida Statutes, is created
111 to read:
112 101.7325 Election emergency.—
113 (1) If the Governor declares a state of emergency pursuant
114 to s. 252.36 less than 60 days before an election, the
115 supervisor of a county included in the state of emergency
116 declaration may request approval from the Secretary of State to
117 take any of the following actions necessary while the emergency
118 declaration continues to include the county as an affected area:
119 (a) Notwithstanding s. 101.657(1)(d), allow early voting
120 to occur the day before an election.
121 (b) Notwithstanding ss. 101.657 and 101.71, allow election
122 day voting at early voting sites. The request must set forth
123 sufficient facts to establish that a sufficient number of
124 designated early voting sites, or sites that may be designated
125 under subsection (3) are unavailable due to the emergency. For
Page 5 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1191-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1191 2026
126 purposes of this paragraph, reasons that a polling place may be
127 unavailable include, but are not limited to, the polling place
128 no longer being safe for occupancy, the polling place being
129 located in an area that is currently dangerous or difficult to
130 travel to and from, or the polling place lacking adequate
131 utilities. An early voting site designated as a polling place
132 under this paragraph must, to the maximum extent practicable, be
133 geographically located so as to provide all voters in the area
134 with an equal opportunity to cast a ballot.
135 (c) Notwithstanding the designation deadline in s.
136 101.69(2)(b), designate additional secure ballot intake
137 stations. The request must identify the locations of the
138 additional secure ballot intake stations.
139 (d) Notwithstanding s. 102.012(2), appoint inspectors and
140 clerks who are registered qualified electors of this state but
141 who are not registered qualified electors of the applicable
142 county.
143 (2) Each supervisor who submits a request pursuant to
144 subsection (1) shall, to the extent practicable, submit all such
145 requests at once. A supervisor may submit revised or additional
146 requests if the emergency situation in his or her affected
147 county changes. The Secretary of State shall approve or deny the
148 requests in writing within 36 hours after receipt. In deciding
149 whether to approve the requests, the Secretary of State shall
150 consider the severity of the natural emergency, the damage to
Page 6 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1191-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1191 2026
151 the impacted area, the extent of voter displacement, whether
152 voters in an affected area have an equal opportunity to cast a
153 ballot, and any factor that could impede voter access or
154 transport to polling places, early voting sites, or supervisor
155 offices. If the Secretary of State fails to approve or deny a
156 request within the 36-hour period, the request is deemed
157 approved. The Secretary of State shall publish each approval and
158 denial on the department's website as soon as practicable. The
159 department shall maintain an official record of all requests
160 submitted under subsection (1), together with all approvals and
161 denials, for public inspection pursuant to chapter 119 and shall
162 compile such records in a format that facilitates review and
163 analysis to strengthen future contingency planning and the
164 development of best practices in election administration. Such
165 records must also be used to inform the election emergency
166 training program and best practices workgroup required under s.
167 101.736.
168 (3) If the Governor declares a state of emergency pursuant
169 to s. 252.36 less than 60 days before an election, the
170 supervisor of a county included in the state of emergency
171 declaration may take any of the following actions necessary
172 while the emergency declaration continues to include the county
173 as an affected area, upon provision of notice to the Secretary
174 of State:
175 (a) Notwithstanding the designation deadline in s.
Page 7 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1191-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1191 2026
176 101.657(1)(b), change the location of designated early voting
177 sites. The notice must identify the new address of each early
178 voting site and the hours during which early voting will occur
179 at each site.
180 (b) Notwithstanding the early voting site locations
181 specifically authorized in s. 101.657(1), designate early voting
182 sites at other locations in areas of the county where eligible
183 early voting locations are unavailable. The notice must set
184 forth sufficient facts to establish that a sufficient number of
185 early voting sites that were designated or that may be
186 designated under paragraph (a) are unavailable due to the
187 emergency. For purposes of this paragraph, reasons that an early
188 voting site may be unavailable include, but are not limited to,
189 the site no longer being safe for occupancy, the site being
190 located in an area that is currently dangerous or difficult to
191 travel to and from, or the site lacking adequate utilities. An
192 early voting site designated under this paragraph must, to the
193 maximum extent practicable, be geographically located so as to
194 provide all voters in the area with an equal opportunity to cast
195 a ballot.
196 (c) If the supervisor determines that a poll worker
197 shortage exists, appoint poll workers who have not met the
198 training requirements in s. 102.014. However, such poll workers
199 must have received the required training within the previous 2
200 years.
Page 8 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1191-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1191 2026
201 (d) Send a vote-by-mail ballot to a voter who has
202 requested such ballot:
203 1. By forwardable mail or to an address other than the
204 address listed for the voter in the statewide voter registration
205 system.
206 2. Notwithstanding s. 101.62(1)(a) and (b), without the
207 voter's written request or if a written request is not signed.
208 3. Notwithstanding s. 101.62(3)(c), as soon as
209 practicable.
210 Section 4. Section 101.733, Florida Statutes, is amended
211 to read:
212 101.733 Emergency suspension or delay of an election
213 emergency; purpose; elections emergency contingency plan.—
214 Because of the existing and continuing possibility of an
215 emergency or common disaster occurring before or during a
216 regularly scheduled or special election, and in order to ensure
217 maximum citizen participation in the electoral process and
218 provide a safe and orderly procedure for persons seeking to
219 exercise their right to vote, generally to minimize to whatever
220 degree possible a person's exposure to danger during declared
221 states of emergency, and to protect the integrity of the
222 electoral process, it is hereby found and declared to be
223 necessary to designate a procedure for the emergency suspension
224 or delay and rescheduling of elections.
225 (1) The Governor may, upon issuance of an executive order
Page 9 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1191-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1191 2026
226 declaring a state of emergency or impending emergency, suspend
227 or delay any election. The Governor may take such action
228 independently or at the request of the Secretary of State, a
229 supervisor of elections from a county affected by the emergency
230 circumstances, or a municipal clerk from a municipality affected
231 by the emergency circumstances.
232 (2) The Governor, upon consultation with the Secretary of
233 State, shall reschedule any election suspended or delayed due to
234 an emergency. The election shall be held within 10 days after
235 the date of the suspended or delayed election or as soon
236 thereafter as is practicable. Notice of the election must be
237 published on the affected county's website as provided in s.
238 50.0311, on the affected supervisor's website, on any official
239 social media account controlled by the supervisor or the
240 supervisor's office, on the affected county's official social
241 media accounts, and or at least once in a newspaper of general
242 circulation in the affected area and, where practicable,
243 broadcast as a public service announcement on radio and
244 television stations at least 1 week before the date the election
245 is to be held. Contingency planning and procedures for elections
246 suspended or delayed under this section must be implemented in
247 accordance with s. 101.735.
248 (3) The Division of Elections of the Department of State
249 shall adopt, by rule, an elections emergency contingency plan,
250 which shall contain goals and policies that give specific
Page 10 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1191-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1191 2026
251 direction to state and local elections officials when an
252 election has been suspended or delayed due to an emergency. The
253 contingency plan shall be statewide in scope and shall address,
254 but not be limited to, the following concerns:
255 (a) Providing a procedure for state and local elections
256 officials to follow when an election has been suspended or
257 delayed to ensure notice of the suspension or delay to the
258 proper authorities, the electorate, the communications media,
259 poll workers, and the custodians of polling places.
260 (b) Providing a procedure for the orderly conduct of a
261 rescheduled election, whether municipal, county, district, or
262 statewide in scope; coordinating those efforts with the
263 appropriate elections official, and the members of the governing
264 body holding such election, if appropriate; and working with the
265 appropriate emergency management officials in determining the
266 safety of existing polling places or designating additional
267 polling places.
268 (c) Providing a procedure for the release and
269 certification of election returns to the department for
270 elections suspended or delayed and subsequently rescheduled
271 under the provisions of ss. 101.731-101.74.
272 Section 5. Section 101.735, Florida Statutes, is created
273 to read:
274 101.735 Election emergency contingency plans.—
275 (1) The division shall adopt by rule a statewide election
Page 11 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1191-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1191 2026
276 emergency contingency plan to provide specific direction in the
277 event that an emergency occurs preceding or during an election.
278 At a minimum, the contingency plan must include procedures to
279 accomplish all of the following:
280 (a) Ensure that necessary parties are notified of any
281 changes impacting an election that has been suspended, delayed,
282 rescheduled, or otherwise affected by an emergency. As used in
283 this paragraph, the term "necessary parties" includes proper
284 authorities, the electorate, the media, poll workers, and
285 polling place custodians.
286 (b) Ensure that an election that has been suspended,
287 delayed, rescheduled, or otherwise affected by an emergency is
288 conducted in a safe and orderly manner and include a plan to
289 coordinate the actions of the division, supervisors, county
290 canvassing boards and, if appropriate, members of the governing
291 body holding such election.
292 (c) Assess the safety and accessibility of existing
293 polling places and, when necessary, designate additional polling
294 places in coordination with emergency management officials.
295 (d) Release and certify returns to the division for
296 elections suspended, delayed, rescheduled, or otherwise affected
297 by an emergency.
298 (e) Coordinate efforts between supervisors in affected and
299 unaffected counties to ensure voting opportunities for affected
300 voters, including ensuring the delivery of vote-by-mail ballots
Page 12 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1191-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1191 2026
301 to law enforcement officers, military personnel, first
302 responders, and utility line workers.
303 (2) Each supervisor, in consultation with local emergency
304 management officials, shall develop a local election emergency
305 contingency plan. The plan must be submitted to the division for
306 approval by May 1 of every odd-numbered year. By May 30 of every
307 odd-numbered year, the division shall determine whether the plan
308 is sufficient under standard criteria adopted by rule. A
309 supervisor whose plan is deemed insufficient must submit a
310 revised plan within 30 days after notification. The criteria for
311 determining sufficiency must include minimum requirements for
312 postdisaster assessments, including community consultation to
313 evaluate the extent of impact on voter access.
314 (3) Contingency plans developed under this section must be
315 implemented in conjunction with ss. 101.733 and 101.738 to
316 ensure coordination of emergency powers and the availability of
317 necessary election equipment.
318 Section 6. Section 101.736, Florida Statutes, is created
319 to read:
320 101.736 Election emergency training; best practices.—
321 (1) As used in this section, the term "tabletop exercise"
322 means a session in which participants are guided through
323 possible scenarios and discuss their roles and responsibilities
324 if such a scenario occurs, as well as how they would respond to
325 such a scenario.
Page 13 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1191-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1191 2026
326 (2) The Secretary of State, in coordination with
327 supervisors, shall develop an election emergency training
328 program. The training program is required for newly elected or
329 appointed supervisors and any critical staff, as determined by a
330 supervisor. The Secretary of State shall update such training at
331 least once every 4 years.
332 (3) By June 1 of every odd-numbered year, the Secretary of
333 State shall convene a workgroup to create a list of best
334 practices for conducting an election during or after an
335 emergency. In developing the list, the workgroup must review the
336 official records of requests, approvals, and denials maintained
337 under s. 101.7325(2) to identify lessons learned and
338 opportunities for improvement. The workgroup must:
339 (a) Include at least 10 current supervisors of elections;
340 and
341 (b) Participate in tabletop exercises involving election
342 emergencies.
343 (4) Using the list created under subsection (3), the
344 Secretary of State shall:
345 (a) Incorporate practices applicable to all counties into
346 the statewide election emergency contingency plan under s.
347 101.735(1).
348 (b) Recommend practices applicable to specific counties to
349 the applicable supervisor for inclusion in the supervisor's
350 local election emergency contingency plan under s. 101.735(2).
Page 14 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1191-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1191 2026
351 Section 7. Section 101.738, Florida Statutes, is created
352 to read:
353 101.738 Strategic elections equipment reserve.—
354 (1) The division shall maintain a secure strategic
355 election equipment reserve that may be deployed in the event of
356 an emergency or in the event of capacity issues due to
357 unexpected voter turnout.
358 (2) At a minimum, the reserve must include ballot marking
359 devices, scanners, tabulation equipment, ballot-on-demand
360 printers, paper required for voting machines and printers,
361 accessible voting equipment, electronic poll books,
362 uninterruptible power supplies, generators, cabling, and power
363 cords and may also include other related equipment necessary to
364 ensure continuity of elections, consistent with the voting
365 systems certified for use by each supervisor of elections.
366 (3) In lieu of maintaining a physical reserve of such
367 equipment, the division may contract with one or more certified
368 vendors of voting systems to provide such equipment on an as-
369 needed basis. Any such contract must include all of the
370 following:
371 (a) A guaranteed delivery timeframe no later than 24 hours
372 after a request by a supervisor of elections, the division, or
373 the department.
374 (b) Requirements for secure transportation, installation,
375 and removal of equipment.
Page 15 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1191-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1191 2026
376 (c) Maintenance of secure custody and detailed chain of
377 custody records for all equipment, consistent with s. 101.015
378 and related administrative rules, including documentation of
379 each transfer, installation, and removal and compliance with
380 applicable state cybersecurity and physical security standards.
381 (4) The division shall submit an annual report by February
382 1 to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker
383 of the House of Representatives which includes all of the
384 following:
385 (a) The current inventory of equipment held in reserve or
386 available by vendor contract.
387 (b) A list of all deployments of equipment under this
388 section during the prior calendar year, including the reason for
389 deployment, response time, and associated costs.
390 (c) Recommendations for improvement to ensure readiness
391 for future elections.
392 Section 8. Section 101.74, Florida Statutes, is amended to
393 read:
394 101.74 Temporary change of polling place in case of
395 emergency.—In case of an emergency existing in any precinct at
396 the time of the holding of any election, the supervisor of
397 elections may establish, at any safe, accessible, and convenient
398 point outside such precinct, an additional polling place for the
399 electors of that precinct, in which place the qualified electors
400 may vote. The qualified electors of the affected precinct may
Page 16 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1191-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1191 2026
401 vote at such location, and the registration books of the
402 affected precinct shall be applicable to, and shall be used at,
403 the polling place so established. The supervisor shall provide
404 notice of the temporary polling place change through signage at
405 the original site, the supervisor's website and related social
406 media accounts, and other reasonable means, such as signage at
407 nearby emergency shelters or temporary housing locations, to
408 inform affected voters. In exercising this authority, the
409 supervisors of elections may coordinate with emergency
410 management officials under s. 101.735 or apply relevant best
411 practices developed under s. 101.736, but such coordination is
412 not a prerequisite to action under this section.
413 Section 9. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 17 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1191-00